public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG num
SFX A íder iderò/I [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder ideròi/J [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idese/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idesi [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idesta/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder ideste/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idesti/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idesto/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder ideva/IOQ [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idevai/J [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idevau/P [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder ideve/I [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idevei/J [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idevi/MO [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idevo/I [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idevoi/J [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idi/EGM [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idimo/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idimoi/L [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idion/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idione/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idionse/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idisen/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idisene/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idisense/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idision/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idisione/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idisionse/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idison/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idisone/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idisonse/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idiven/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idivense/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idivion/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idivionse/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idivié/O [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idiviéu/P [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idivon/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idivonse/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idié/O [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idiéu/P [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder ido/IJ [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idon/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idone/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idonse/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idua/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder iduda/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idude/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idudi/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idudo/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idue/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idui/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder iduo/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idé/GO [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idéa/IOQ [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idée/I [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idéelo/R [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idéi/MO [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idéimo/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idéimoi/L [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idéitu/N [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idéo/I [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idésimo [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idéu/P [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idévelo/R [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idévimo/K [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idévimoi/L [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idévitu/N [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idí/GO [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idíu/P [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder idú [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder ixa [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder ixe [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder ixi [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íder ixo/H [rvŧ]íder
SFX A íjer ija [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ije/HIJQ [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeai/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeau/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijede [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeei/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijege [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijemo/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijemoi/L [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijen/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijendo/EG [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijene/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijense/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijente [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeoi/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeralo/R [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeratu/N [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerave/QS [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeremo/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeremoi/L [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeren/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerense/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeresi/O [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeresiu/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeriai/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeriei/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerimo/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerimoi/L [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerion/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerionse/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerisen/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerisense/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerision/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerisionse/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerisié/O [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerisiéu/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerison/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerisonse/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerié/O [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeriéu/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeron/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeronse/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerà/IMQ [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeràe/Q [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerài/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerè/I [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerèi/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeré/O [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerésimo/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerésimoi/L [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeréu/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerí/O [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijería/IMQ [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeríatu/N [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeríe/IQ [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeríelo/R [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeríu/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijerò/I [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeròi/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijese/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijesi [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijesta/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeste/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijesti/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijesto/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeva/IOQ [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijevai/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijevau/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijeve/I [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijevei/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijevi/MO [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijevo/I [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijevoi/J [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer iji/EGM [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijimo/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijimoi/L [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijisen/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijisene/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijisense/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijision/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijisione/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijisionse/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijison/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijisone/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijisonse/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijiven/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijivense/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijivion/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijivionse/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijivié/O [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijiviéu/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijivon/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijivonse/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijié/O [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijiéu/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijo/IJ [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijon/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijone/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijonse/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijua/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijuda/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijude/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijudi/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijudo/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijue/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijui/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijuo/H [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijé/GO [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijéa/IOQ [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijée/I [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijéelo/R [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijéi/MO [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijéimo/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijéimoi/L [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijéitu/N [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijéo/I [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijésimo [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijéu/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijévelo/R [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijévimo/K [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijévimoi/L [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijévitu/N [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijí/GO [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijíu/P [en]xíjer
SFX A íjer ijú [en]xíjer
SFX A ímer enta exímer
SFX A ímer ente exímer
SFX A ímer enti exímer
SFX A ímer ento/H exímer
SFX A ímer ima exímer
SFX A ímer ima reprímer
SFX A ímer ime/HIJQ exímer
SFX A ímer ime/HIJQ reprímer
SFX A ímer imeai/J [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeau/P [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imede [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeei/J [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imege [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imemo/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imemoi/L [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imen/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imendo/EG [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imene/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imense/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imente [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeoi/J [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeralo/R [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeratu/N [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerave/QS [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeremo/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeremoi/L [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeren/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerense/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeresi/O [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeresiu/P [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeriai/J [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeriei/J [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerimo/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerimoi/L [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerion/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerionse/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerisen/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerisense/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerision/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerisionse/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerisié/O [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerisiéu/P [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerison/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerisonse/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerié/O [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeriéu/P [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeron/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeronse/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerà/IMQ [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeràe/Q [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerài/J [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerè/I [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerèi/J [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeré/O [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerésimo/K [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerésimoi/L [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeréu/P [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerí/O [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imería/IMQ [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeríatu/N [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeríe/IQ [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeríelo/R [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeríu/P [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imerò/I [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeròi/J [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imese/H [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imesi [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imesta/H [rx]ímer
SFX A ímer imeste/H [rx]ímer
