public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
abokadar/A
albeđar/A
alŧar/A
andonar/A
apostrofar/A
arguir/A
aséder/A
atribuir/A
dexautorar/A
inaxolar/A
xbagaŧar/A
inbajokar/A
traxbalar/A
balkar/A
inbalsemar/A
inbanbolar/A
xbankar/A
baratar/A
inbaretar/A
inbaronar/A
strabastar/A
rebatiđar/A
dexbaukar/A
xbaveŧar/A
inbekar/A
inbendar/A
xbertonar/A
strabéver/A
xbiankir/A
bibiar/A
bindar/A
inbirir/A
bivakar/A
inbogar/A
bóɉer/A
inbokolar/A
xboloñar/A
bonaŧar/A
xbonigolar/A
boraskar/A
exborsar/A
inbotir/A
aboŧar/A
brakiđar/A
xbraɉar/A
inbrandir/A
braŧolar/A
dexbriagar/A
brinkar/A
dexbrojar/A
xbroketar/A
xbrufar/A
bruxar/A
inbugar/A
skonbusolar/A
buxarar/A
camar/A
scarar/A
incefar/A
intracèñer/A
céñer/A
cetar/A
cikar/A
scokar/A
dir/A
damaskar/A
indebolir/A
xdentar/A
destreɉar/A
diamantar/A
díxer/A
dixnar/A
dolŧir/A
donar/A
dexdopiar/A
dormikiar/A
drapar/A
durar/A
prededúxer/A
đèmer/A
ađónxer/A
ađornar/A
sperđurar/A
eklisar/A
riensir/A
erpegar/A
evínŧer/A
exíster/A
dexasuefar/A
tumefar/A
sfadigar/A
defalkar/A
sfamar/A
sfantar/A
infasar/A
faŧendar/A
falsifegar/A
palifegar/A
fegurar/A
ofénder/A
desferar/A
fermar/A
fetar/A
dexinfiar/A
sfiankonar/A
fidar/A
infierir/A
desfilar/A
konfinar/A
fiokar/A
sfioriđar/A
infiscar/A
reflèter/A
fodrar/A
sfogar/A
refolar/A
forfar/A
raforŧar/A
franar/A
fratar/A
desfregolar/A
infrolir/A
ŧentrifugar/A
sfumar/A
ofuskar/A
ingalar/A
xganasar/A
dexgarbelar/A
dexgateɉar/A
globolar/A
gorar/A
ingramir/A
xgrankir/A
agravar/A
ingretolir/A
dexgritolir/A
ingrosar/A
xgualivar/A
ingurxitar/A
ilunar/A
ingaxar/A
inritar/A
inŧitar/A
tranxíɉer/A
inɉermar/A
dexɉustar/A
inkagar/A
kalkar/A
rekalŧar/A
skanalar/A
kanopar/A
inkañir/A
skaponar/A
karenar/A
skarpir/A
inkasar/A
skatarar/A
kaŧar/A
deskavedar/A
klonar/A
koɉonar/A
inkolegar/A
komenŧar/A
konbàter/A
konpanegar/A
konteđar/A
konvoɉar/A
rekórer/A
skòrđer/A
skorsiđar/A
inkoŧir/A
kréder/A
kriolar/A
inkrostolar/A
skuadronar/A
deskuèrđer/A
skukar/A
inkurar/A
rekúxer/A
laorar/A
xlatinar/A
ledamar/A
xlepar/A
xlexierir/A
xlikiñar/A
lisiar/A
lontanar/A
lumar/A
xluxegar/A
xmaɉar/A
mandar/A
manipolar/A
maravejar/A
martiriđar/A
inmaskarar/A
maŧar/A
mediar/A
menar/A
xmentir/A
merkantiđar/A
prométer/A
minaŧar/A
dexmisiar/A
xmokolar/A
xmonar/A
premorir/A
xmorfir/A
motar/A
mucarar/A
muñegar/A
mutilar/A
nàser/A
negar/A
ninar/A
renonŧiar/A
xñanfiđar/A
oceđar/A
oliar/A
ónđer/A
straordenar/A
ortigar/A
inpacar/A
repagar/A
spalar/A
palpiñar/A
spanpalar/A
parir/A
inparentar/A
partiŧionar/A
spasiđar/A
patinar/A
spaŧientar/A
arpegar/A
spelegar/A
spénder/A
inpensierir/A
deperir/A
pertegar/A
peteđolar/A
speŧegar/A
repiantar/A
repiegar/A
pincar/A
pipar/A
pistoletar/A
aplàuder/A
polejar/A
inpomolar/A
skonpóner/A
inpontir/A
pónxer/A
straportar/A
potar/A
spovolar/A
sopresar/A
dexinprimar/A
prosimar/A
puñar/A
putelar/A
eradegar/A
ramar/A
rantolar/A
rausir/A
reklutar/A
respexolar/A
ridakiar/A
dexriŧolar/A
roejar/A
romàñer/A
ropegar/A
roviɉar/A
rular/A
saer/A
sakeđar/A
saliđar/A
sanar/A
saraxinar/A
scamar/A
sedar/A
segar/A
seguitar/A
seleđar/A
insenetir/A
reaseñar/A
sèrver/A
sfrisar/A
sidiar/A
singolariđar/A
skainar/A
skapolar/A
reskatar/A
skinŧar/A
skorŧar/A
inskríver/A
sofrir/A
soleŧitar/A
sonar/A
insordir/A
sparar/A
inspear/A
spetar/A
spinar/A
spiumaŧar/A
spronar/A
restabilir/A
starnudir/A
instaurar/A
stilar/A
sostituir/A
instokar/A
stranbar/A
instrigar/A
dexostruir/A
studar/A
insubiotar/A
insultar/A
susitar/A
destajar/A
taketar/A
tanbukiar/A
tardir/A
tastar/A
tàxer/A
esténder/A
tenkar/A
sostentar/A
konteñir/A
intratèñer/A
otéñer/A
terminar/A
intestar/A
destirar/A
intokar/A
stondar/A
intorcar/A
stortar/A
intosegar/A
trabakar/A
tranbalar/A
tratar/A
travaɉar/A
treskar/A
intrigar/A
intronbonar/A
trusar/A
stuŧegar/A
ŧavatar/A
ŧentrar/A
ŧernir/A
deŧíder/A
ŧimegar/A
ŧirkuir/A
ŧotegar/A
unir/A
maluxar/A
prevaler/A
xvanpir/A
invaxar/A
travéder/A
velenar/A
inventar/A
interveñir/A
devèñer/A
soravèñer/A
xvergoñaŧar/A
inversiar/A
envestir/A
xviar/A
vinaŧar/A
viŧiar/A
revixionar/A
malvoler/A
xvoltolar/A
revòlxer/A
soxàŧer/A
xbrisiar/A
konxeñar/A
xirar/A
xmergolar/A
xovar/A
